Ohio, session 136, HB776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4511.01, 4511.041, and 4511.25 be amended and section 4511.551 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4511.01. As used in this chapter and in Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code: (A) "Vehicle" means every device, including a bicycle, motorized bicycle, and an electric bicycle, in, upon, or by which any person or property may be transported or drawn upon a highway. "Vehicle" does not include any motorized wheelchair, any electric personal assistive mobility device, any low-speed micromobility device, any personal delivery device as defined in section 4511.513 of the Revised Code, any device that is moved by power collected from overhead electric trolley wires or that is used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or any device that is moved by human power. (B) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle propelled or drawn by power other than muscular power or power collected from overhead electric trolley wires, except motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, road rollers, traction engines, power shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used in construction work and not designed for or employed in general highway transportation, hole-digging machinery, well-drilling machinery, ditch-digging machinery, farm machinery, and trailers designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a distance of no more than ten miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. (C) "Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle, other than a tractor, having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles known as "motor-driven cycle," "motor scooter," "autocycle," "cab-enclosed motorcycle," or "motorcycle" without regard to weight or brake horsepower. (D) "Emergency vehicle" means emergency vehicles of municipal, township, or county departments or public utility corporations when identified as such as required by law, the director of public safety, or local authorities, and motor vehicles when commandeered by a police officer. (E) "Public safety vehicle" means any of the following: (1) Ambulances, including private ambulance companies under contract to a municipal corporation, township, or county, and private ambulances and nontransport vehicles bearing license plates issued under section 4503.49 of the Revised Code; (2) Motor vehicles used by public law enforcement officers or other persons sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state; (3) Any motor vehicle when properly identified as required by the director of public safety, when used in response to fire emergency calls or to provide emergency medical service to ill or injured persons, and when operated by a duly qualified person who is a member of a volunteer rescue service or a volunteer fire department, and who is on duty pursuant to the rules or directives of that service. The state fire marshal shall be designated by the director of public safety as the certifying agency for all public safety vehicles described in division (E)(3) of this section. (4) Vehicles used by fire departments, including motor vehicles when used by volunteer fire fighters responding to emergency calls in the fire department service when identified as required by the director of public safety. Any vehicle used to transport or provide emergency medical service to an ill or injured person, when certified as a public safety vehicle, shall be considered a public safety vehicle when transporting an ill or injured person to a hospital regardless of whether such vehicle has already passed a hospital. (5) Vehicles used by the motor carrier enforcement unit for the enforcement of orders and rules of the public utilities commission as specified in section 5503.34 of the Revised Code. (F) "School bus" means every bus designed for carrying more than nine passengers that is owned by a public, private, or governmental agency or institution of learning and operated for the transportation of children to or from a school session or a school function, or owned by a private person and operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from a school session or a school function. "School bus" does not include any of the following: (1) A bus operated by a municipally owned transportation system, a mass transit company operating exclusively within the territorial limits of a municipal corporation, or within such limits and the territorial limits of municipal corporations immediately contiguous to such municipal corporation, nor a common passenger carrier certified by the public utilities commission unless such bus is devoted exclusively to the transportation of children to and from a school session or a school function; (2) A van or bus used by a licensed child care center or type A family child care home to transport children from the child care center or type A family child care home to a school if the van or bus does not have more than fifteen children in the van or bus at any time; (3) An alternative vehicle as defined in section 4511.76 of the Revised Code. (G) "Bicycle" means a pedal-powered vehicle upon which a human operator sits, including an electric bicycle. (H) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle having either two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and two wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is equipped with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than one brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed of not greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an electric bicycle. (I) "Commercial tractor" means every motor vehicle having motive power designed or used for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry any load thereon, or designed or used for drawing other vehicles while carrying a portion of such other vehicles, or load thereon, or both. (J) "Agricultural tractor" and "traction engine" mean every self-propelling vehicle designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery but having no provision for carrying loads independently of such other vehicles, and used principally for agricultural purposes. (K) "Truck" means every motor vehicle, except trailers and semitrailers, designed and used to carry property. (L) "Bus" means every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than nine passengers and used for the transportation of persons other than in a ridesharing arrangement, and every motor vehicle, automobile for hire, or funeral car, other than a taxicab or motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement, designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation. (M) "Trailer" means every vehicle designed or used for carrying persons or property wholly on its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, including any such vehicle when formed by or operated as a combination of a "semitrailer" and a vehicle of the dolly type, such as that commonly known as a "trailer dolly," a vehicle used to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production materials between a local place of storage or supply and the farm when drawn or towed on a street or highway at a speed greater than twenty-five miles per hour, and a vehicle designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a distance of more than ten miles or at a speed of more than twenty-five miles per hour. (N) "Semitrailer" means every vehicle designed or used for carrying persons or property with another and separate motor vehicle so that in operation a part of its own weight or that of its load, or both, rests upon and is carried by another vehicle. (O) "Pole trailer" means every trailer or semitrailer attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregular shaped loads such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections. (P) "Railroad" means a carrier of persons or property operating upon rails or tracks placed principally on a private right-of-way. (Q) "Train" means one or more locomotives coupled, with or without cars, that operates on rails or tracks and to which all other traffic is required by law to yield the right-of-way at highway-rail grade crossings. (R) "Streetcar" means a car, other than a train, for transporting persons or property, operated upon rails principally within a street or highway. (S) "Trackless trolley" means every car that collects its power from overhead electric trolley wires and that is not operated upon rails or tracks. (T) "Explosives" means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is intended for the purpose of producing an explosion that contains any oxidizing and combustible units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by a detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects, or of destroying life or limb. Manufactured articles shall not be held to be explosives when the individual units contain explosives in such limited quantities, of such nature, or in such packing, that it is impossible to procure a simultaneous or a destructive explosion of such units, to the injury of life, limb, or property by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by a detonator, such as fixed ammunition for small arms, firecrackers, or safety fuse matches. (U) "Flammable liquid" means any liquid that has a flash point of seventy degrees fahrenheit, or less, as determined by a tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device. (V) "Gross weight" means the weight of a vehicle plus the weight of any load thereon. (W) "Person" means every natural person, firm, co-partnership, association, or corporation. (X) "Pedestrian" means any person on foot, in a motorized or non-motorized wheelchair, or using another equivalent device, such as skates or a skateboard. "Pedestrian" includes a personal delivery device as defined in section 4511.513 of the Revised Code unless the context clearly suggests otherwise. (Y) "Driver or operator" means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar. (Z) "Police officer" means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic, or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations. (AA) "Local authorities" means every county, municipal, and other local board or body having authority to adopt police regulations under the constitution and laws of this state. (BB) "Street" or "highway" means a general term for denoting a public way for purposes of travel by vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and vulnerable road users, including the entire area within the right-of-way. (CC) "Controlled-access highway" means every street or highway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from the same except at such points only and in such manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over such street or highway. (DD) "Private road" means every way or place in private ownership used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner but not by other persons. (EE) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel and parking lanes, not including the berm, sidewalk, or shoulder, even if the berm, sidewalk, or shoulder is used by a person operating a bicycle or other human-powered vehicle. If a highway includes two or more separate roadways the term "roadway" means any such roadway separately but not all such roadways collectively. (FF) "Sidewalk" means that portion of a street between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines or easements of private property, that is paved or improved, and is intended for the use of pedestrians. (GG) "Laned highway" means a highway the roadway of which is divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic. (HH) "Through highway" means every street or highway as provided in section 4511.65 of the Revised Code. (II) "State highway" means a highway under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation, outside the limits of municipal corporations, provided that the authority conferred upon the director of transportation in section 5511.01 of the Revised Code to erect state highway route markers and signs directing traffic shall not be modified by sections 4511.01 to 4511.79 and 4511.99 of the Revised Code. (JJ) "State route" means every highway that is designated with an official state route number and so marked. (KK) "Intersection" means: (1) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two highways that join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways that join at any other angle might come into conflict. The junction of an alley, driveway, or site roadway open to public travel with a public roadway or highway does not constitute an intersection, unless the public roadway or highway at the junction is controlled by a traffic control device. (2) If a highway includes two roadways separated by a median, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway constitutes a separate intersection if the opposing left-turn paths cross and there is sufficient interior storage for the design vehicle. As used in this division, "design vehicle" means the longest vehicle authorized under section 5577.05 of the Revised Code to operate on that roadway without a permit. (3) At a location controlled by a highway traffic signal, regardless of the distance between the separate intersections as described in division (KK)(2) of this section: (a) If a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk has not been designated on the roadway within the median between the separate intersections, the two intersections and the roadway and median constitute one intersection. (b) Where a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk is designated on the roadway on the intersection approach, the area within the crosswalk and any area beyond the designated stop line or yield line constitute part of the intersection. (c) Where a crosswalk is designated on a roadway on the departure from the intersection, the intersection includes the area that extends to the far side of the crosswalk. (LL) "Crosswalk" means: (1) That part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs, or, in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway, and in the absence of a sidewalk on one side of the roadway, the part of a roadway included within the extension of the lateral lines of the sidewalk at right angles to the center line; (2) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere, distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface, which might be supplemented by contrasting pavement texture, style, or color; (3) Notwithstanding divisions (LL)(1) and (2) of this section, "crosswalk" does not include an area where local authorities have placed signs indicating no crossing. (MM) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and protected or marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times. (NN) "Business district" means the territory fronting upon a street or highway, including the street or highway, between successive intersections within municipal corporations where fifty per cent or more of the frontage between such successive intersections is occupied by buildings in use for business, or within or outside municipal corporations where fifty per cent or more of the frontage for a distance of three hundred feet or more is occupied by buildings in use for business, and the character of such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. (OO) "Residence district" means the territory, not comprising a business district, fronting on a street or highway, including the street or highway, where, for a distance of three hundred feet or more, the frontage is improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business. (PP) "Urban district" means the territory contiguous to and including any street or highway which is built up with structures devoted to business, industry, or dwelling houses situated at intervals of less than one hundred feet for a distance of a quarter of a mile or more, and the character of such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. (QQ) "Traffic control device" means a flagger, sign, signal, marking, channelization device, or other device that uses colors, shapes, symbols, words, sounds, or tactile information for the primary purpose of communicating a regulatory, warning, or guidance message to road users on a street, highway, site roadway open to public travel, pedestrian facility, bikeway, or pathway. (RR) "Traffic control signal" means a highway traffic signal placed at an intersection, movable bridge, fire station, midblock crosswalk, alternating one-way sections of a single lane road, private driveway, or other location that requires conflicting traffic to be directed to stop and permitted to proceed in an orderly manner. "Traffic control signal" includes a vehicular signal indication, a pedestrian signal indication, and a bicycle symbol signal indication. "Traffic control signal" does not include an emergency-vehicle hybrid beacon or a pedestrian hybrid beacon. (SS) "Railroad sign or signal" means any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a train. (TT) "Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and other devices, either singly or together, while using for purposes of travel any highway or site roadway open to public travel. (UU) "Right-of-way" means either of the following, as the context requires: (1) The right of a vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or pedestrian to proceed uninterruptedly in a lawful manner in the direction in which it or the individual is moving in preference to another vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or pedestrian approaching from a different direction into its or the individual's path; (2) A general term denoting land, property, or the interest therein, usually in the configuration of a strip, acquired for or devoted to transportation purposes. When used in this context, right-of-way includes the roadway, shoulders or berm, ditch, and slopes extending to the right-of-way limits under the control of the state or local authority. (VV) "Rural mail delivery vehicle" means every vehicle used to deliver United States mail on a rural mail delivery route. (WW) "Funeral escort vehicle" means any motor vehicle, including a funeral hearse, while used to facilitate the movement of a funeral procession. (XX) "Alley" means a street or highway intended to provide access to the rear or side of lots or buildings in urban districts and not intended for the purpose of through vehicular traffic, and includes any street or highway that has been declared an "alley" by the legislative authority of the municipal corporation in which such street or highway is located. (YY) "Freeway" means a divided multi-lane highway for through traffic with all crossroads separated in grade and with full control of access. (ZZ) "Expressway" means a divided arterial street or highway for through traffic with full or partial control of access with an excess of fifty per cent of all crossroads separated in grade. (AAA) "Thruway" means a through highway whose entire roadway is reserved for through traffic and on which roadway parking is prohibited. (BBB) "Stop intersection" means any intersection at one or more entrances of which stop signs are erected. (CCC) "Arterial street or highway" means a street or highway primarily used by through traffic, usually on a continuous route or a street or highway designated as part of an arterial system. (DDD) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where such transportation is incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools. (EEE) "Motorized wheelchair" means any self-propelled vehicle designed for, and used by, a person with a disability and that is incapable of a speed in excess of eight miles per hour. (FFF) "Child care center" and "type A family child care home" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (GGG) "Multi-wheel agricultural tractor" means a type of agricultural tractor that has two or more wheels or tires on each side of one axle at the rear of the tractor, is designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery, has no provision for carrying loads independently of the drawn vehicles or machinery, and is used principally for agricultural purposes. (HHH) "Operate" means to cause or have caused movement of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley. (III) "Predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense" means any of the following: (1) A violation of section 4511.03, 4511.051, 4511.12, 4511.132, 4511.16, 4511.20, 4511.201, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.40, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.432, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 4511.452, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.48, 4511.481, 4511.49, 4511.50, 4511.511, 4511.522, 4511.53, 4511.54, 4511.55, 4511.551, 4511.56, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.66, 4511.661, 4511.68, 4511.70, 4511.701, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 4511.713, 4511.72, 4511.73, 4511.763, 4511.771, 4511.78, or 4511.84 of the Revised Code; (2) A violation of division (A)(2) of section 4511.17, divisions (A) to (D) of section 4511.51, or division (A) of section 4511.74 of the Revised Code; (3) A violation of any provision of sections 4511.01 to 4511.76 of the Revised Code for which no penalty otherwise is provided in the section that contains the provision violated; (4) A violation of section 4511.214 of the Revised Code; (5) A violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any section or provision set forth or described in division (III)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section. (JJJ) "Road service vehicle" means wreckers, utility repair vehicles, and state, county, and municipal service vehicles equipped with visual signals by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights. (KKK) "Beacon" means a highway traffic signal with one or more signal sections that operate in a flashing mode. (LLL) "Hybrid beacon" means a special type of beacon that is intentionally placed in a dark mode where no indications are displayed between periods of operation and, when operated, displays both steady and flashing highway traffic signal indications. "Hybrid beacon" includes both of the following: (1) An emergency-vehicle hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an otherwise unsignalized location to assist authorized emergency vehicles in entering or crossing a street or highway; (2) A pedestrian hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an otherwise unsignalized location to assist pedestrians in crossing a street or highway at a marked crosswalk. (MMM) "Highway traffic signal" means a power-operated traffic control device by which traffic is warned or directed to take some specific action. "Highway traffic signal" includes a beacon, an in-road warning light, a lane-use control signal, and a traffic control signal. "Highway traffic signal" does not include a power-operated sign, steadily illuminated pavement marker, gate, flashing light signal, warning light, or steady burning electric lamp. (NNN) "Median" means the portion of a highway separating opposing directions of the traveled way or the area between two roadways of a divided highway, measured from edge of traveled way to edge of traveled way. The median excludes turn lanes. The width of a median may be different between intersections, interchanges, and at opposite approaches of the same intersection. (OOO) "Site roadway open to public travel" means a roadway or bikeway on site of a shopping center, office park, airport, school, university, sports arena, recreational park, or other similar business, government, or recreation facility that is publicly or privately owned but where the public is allowed to travel without full-time access restrictions. "Site roadway open to public travel" does not include a roadway where access is restricted at all times by gates or guards to residents, employees, or other specifically authorized persons, a parking area, a driving aisle within a parking area, or a private highway-rail grade crossing. (PPP) "Shared-use path" means a bikeway outside the traveled way and physically separated from motorized vehicular traffic by an open space or barrier and either within the highway right-of-way or within an independent alignment. A shared-use path also may be used by pedestrians, including skaters, joggers, users of manual and motorized wheelchairs, and other authorized motorized and non-motorized users. A shared-use path does not include any trail that is intended to be used primarily for mountain biking, hiking, equestrian use, or other similar uses, or any other single track or natural surface trail that has historically been reserved for nonmotorized use. (QQQ) "Highway maintenance vehicle" means a vehicle used in snow and ice removal or road surface maintenance, including a snow plow, traffic line striper, road sweeper, mowing machine, asphalt distributing vehicle, or other such vehicle designed for use in specific highway maintenance activities. (RRR) "Waste collection vehicle" means a vehicle used in the collection of garbage, refuse, trash, or recyclable materials. (SSS) "Electric bicycle" means a "class 1 electric bicycle," a "class 2 electric bicycle," or a "class 3 electric bicycle" as defined in this section. (TTT) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (UUU) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that may provide assistance regardless of whether the rider is pedaling and is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (VVV) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour. (WWW) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. (XXX) "Natural resources officer" means an officer appointed pursuant to section 1501.24 of the Revised Code. (YYY) "Wildlife officer" means an officer designated pursuant to section 1531.13 of the Revised Code. (ZZZ) "In-road warning light" means a special type of highway traffic signal that is installed in the roadway surface to warn road users that they are approaching a condition on or adjacent to the roadway that might not be readily apparent and might require the road users to reduce speed or come to a complete stop. (AAAA) "Lane-use control signal" means a signal face or comparable display on a full-matrix changeable message sign that displays indications to permit or prohibit the use of specific lanes of a roadway or a shoulder where driving is sometimes authorized or to indicate the impending prohibition of such use. (BBBB) "Bicycle box" means a designated area on the approach to a signalized intersection, between an advance motorist stop line and the crosswalk or intersection, that is intended to provide bicyclists a visible location to wait in front of stopped motorists during the red signal phase. (CCCC) "Two-stage bicycle turn box" means a designated area at an intersection that is intended to provide bicyclists a place to wait for traffic to clear before proceeding in a different direction of travel. (DDDD) "Bicycle lane" means a portion of a roadway that has been designated for preferential or exclusive use by bicyclists and is often delineated from the adjacent general-purpose lanes by longitudinal pavement markings and either a bicycle lane symbol, words, or signs. "Bicycle lane" includes all of the following: (1) A buffer-separated bicycle lane, which is separated from the adjacent general-purpose lanes by a pattern of standard longitudinal pavement markings that are wider than a normal or wide-lane pavement marking; (2) A counter-flow bicycle lane, which is a one-directional bicycle lane that provides a lawful path of travel for bicycles in the opposite direction from the general traffic on a roadway that otherwise requires the general traffic to travel in only one direction. A counter-flow bicycle lane is designated by the traffic control devices used for other bicycle lanes; (3) A separated bicycle lane, which is an exclusive facility for bicyclists that is located within or directly adjacent to the roadway and is physically separated from the motor vehicle traffic with a vertical element. (EEEE) "Bicycle signal face" means a signal face that displays only bicycle symbol signal indications in accordance with section 4511.15 of the Revised Code, that exclusively controls a bicyclist's movement from a designated bicycle lane or from a separate facility, and that displays signal indications that are applicable only to a bicyclist's movement. (FFFF) "Bicycle signal sign" means a sign meant to inform road users that the signal indications in the bicycle signal face are intended only for bicyclists, and to inform bicyclists which bicyclist movements are controlled by that bicycle signal face. (GGGG) "Bikeway" means any road, street, path, or way that in some manner is specifically designated for bicycle travel, regardless of whether the facility is designated for the exclusive use of bicycles or if it is shared with other modes of transportation. (HHHH) "Busway" means a traveled way that is used exclusively by buses. (IIII) "Driveway" means an access from a roadway to a building, site, or abutting property. (JJJJ) "Roundabout" means a circular intersection with a yield control at each entry, which permits a vehicle on the circulatory roadway to proceed, with deflection of the approaching vehicles counter-clockwise around a central island. (KKKK) "Shoulder" means a longitudinal area contiguous with the traveled way that is used for accommodating vehicles that are stopped for an emergency and for lateral support of base and surface courses; graded for emergency stopping; either paved or unpaved; and when paved, may be open for part-time travel by some or all vehicles or may also be available for use by pedestrians or bicycles in the absence of other pedestrian or bicycle facilities. (LLLL) "Autocycle," "cab-enclosed motorcycle," "electronic," "farm machinery," "motor-driven cycle or motor scooter," "limited driving privileges," and "state" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (MMMM) "Multifunction school activity bus" means a school bus whose purposes do not include transporting children to and from home or school bus stops. Sec. 4511.041. Sections 4511.12, 4511.13, 4511.131, 4511.132, 4511.14, 4511.202, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.40, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.432, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.551, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.62, 4511.66, 4511.68, 4511.681, and 4511.69 of the Revised Code do not apply to the driver of an emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle if the emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle is responding to an emergency call, is equipped with and displaying at least one flashing, rotating, or oscillating light visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred feet to the front of the vehicle and if the driver of the vehicle is giving an audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell. This section does not relieve the driver of an emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and property upon the highway. Sec. 4511.25. (A) Upon all roadways of sufficient width, a vehicle or trackless trolley shall be driven upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows: (1) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, or when making a left turn under the rules governing such movements; (2) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall yield the right of way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such distance as to constitute an immediate hazard; (3) When driving upon a roadway divided into three or more marked lanes for traffic under the rules applicable thereon; (4) When driving upon a roadway designated and posted with signs for one-way traffic; (5) When otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control device; (6) When operated in accordance with section 4511.551 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Upon all roadways any vehicle or trackless trolley proceeding at less than the prevailing and lawful speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall be driven in the right-hand lane then available for traffic, and far enough to the right to allow passing by faster vehicles if such passing is safe and reasonable, except under any of the following circumstances: (a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle or trackless trolley proceeding in the same direction; (b) When preparing for a left turn; (c) When the driver must necessarily drive in a lane other than the right-hand lane to continue on the driver's intended route; (d) When operated in accordance with section 4511.551 of the Revised Code. (2) Nothing in division (B)(1) of this section requires a driver of a slower vehicle to compromise the driver's safety to allow overtaking by a faster vehicle. (C) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic and providing for two-way movement of traffic, no vehicle or trackless trolley shall be driven to the left of the center line of the roadway, except when authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain lanes to the left of the center of the roadway for use by traffic not otherwise permitted to use the lanes, or except as permitted under division (A)(2) of this section. This division shall not be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making a left turn into or from an alley, private road, or driveway. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4511.551. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Lane filter" means the operation of a motorcycle between two marked lanes of traffic traveling in the same direction when one of the following applies: (a) The other vehicles are stopped. (b) The other vehicles are traveling at a speed of fifteen miles per hour or less. (2) "Lane split" means the operation of a motorcycle between two marked lanes of traffic traveling in the same direction at a speed greater than fifteen miles per hour. (3) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with motive power having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, designed to travel on not more than two wheels in contact with the ground, and having no occupant compartment top or occupant compartment top that can be installed or removed by the user. (B) No person operating a motorcycle shall lane filter unless all of the following apply: (1) The roadway has two or more lanes of travel in the same direction. (2) The posted speed limit is forty-five miles per hour or less. (3) The speed of the motorcycle is not more than ten miles per hour above the speed of the surrounding traffic. (C) No person operating a motorcycle shall lane filter along the curb or shoulder of a roadway. (D) No person shall purposely impede or interfere with the operator of a motorcycle who is lawfully lane filtering. (E) No person operating a motorcycle shall lane split. (F) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (G) Unless a mens rea is otherwise specified in this section, an offense established under this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of that offense as a strict liability offense shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. Section 2. That existing sections 4511.01, 4511.041, and 4511.25 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The Director of Public Safety shall conduct a statewide public education campaign to alert other drivers, motorcycle riders, and the public of the authorization to lane filter granted under section 4511.551 of the Revised Code. As part of that campaign, the Director shall include material on how a motorcycle rider may safely lane filter, the prohibition against lane splitting, and the prohibition against impeding or interfering with a motorcycle rider who is lawfully lane filtering. The Director shall provide both printed and digital communications as part of the campaign.